New Jersey, session 221, S865.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  For purposes of this section, person with a disability means a natural person who has a physical disability, infirmity, malformation, or disfigurement which is caused by bodily injury, birth defect, or illness including epilepsy, and which shall include, but not be limited to, any degree of paralysis, amputation, lack of physical coordination, blindness or visual impairment, deafness or deaf-blindness or hearing impairment, inability to speak or speech impairment, or physical reliance on a service animal, wheelchair, or other remedial appliance or device, or from any mental, psychological, or developmental disability resulting from anatomical, psychological, physiological, or neurological conditions which prevents the normal exercise of any bodily or mental functions or is demonstrable, medically or psychologically, by accepted clinical or laboratory diagnostic techniques. b.    For purposes of this section, vehicle and licensing services shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   providing a change of address; and (2)   obtaining the issuance or renewal of: (a)   basic drivers licenses; (b)   examination permits; (c)   special learners permits; (d)   probationary drivers licenses; (e)   identification cards; (f)   registration certificates; (g)   motor vehicle certificates of ownership, including transfers of ownership; (h)   motor vehicle license plates, including wheelchair symbol license plates; (i)    person with a disability identification cards; and (j)    person with a disability placards. c.     Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall provide in-person vehicle and licensing services at each commission agency location for any person who is 65 years of age or older and any person with a disability. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month after enactment, but the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may take anticipatory actions necessary to implement the provisions of this act.